North Carolina, session 2025, HB1067.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Charter of the Town of Rural Hall, being Chapter 1100 of the 1973
Session Laws, as amended by S.L. 2023-31 and by S.L. 2024-14, is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"Sec. 4.1. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply
with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina,
provided that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections in
G.S. 163-122(a)(4) shall not apply, and the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections in G.S. 163-122(a)(3) shall apply."
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding Section 1 of this act, for purposes of the 2026 election
only, any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office must file a petition with
the county board of elections no later than 12:00 noon on July 6, 2026. Except as otherwise
provided by this section, candidates shall comply with the requirements set out in Article 11 of
Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective January 1, 2027, and applies to
elections held in 2028 and thereafter. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies to petitions filed on or after that date.
*H1067-v-3*